src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.%0-STAT@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.TRANSITIONAL.ON@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @U.VV.%0@ @U.VV.S@ @U.VV.I@ @D.TRANSITIONAL@ @D.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@ @D.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@ @D.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@ @U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@ @U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ @U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ @U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@ @R.LOWTONE.ON@ @P.LOWTONE.ON@ @D.LOWTONE@ @R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@ @D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@ @U.NITONE.MID@ @R.NITONE.MID@ @D.NITONE@ i2 s2 s3 ^L ^P

LEXICON Root

@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                              TAMA;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                             TAMA;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                                Transitional;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                              Transitional;
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@                                TAMA;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@                            TAMA;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@                            TAMA;


LEXICON Transitional

@U.TRANSITIONAL.ON@                                    TransitionalPrefix;
@D.TRANSITIONAL@                                       TAMA;

LEXICON TransitionalPrefix

! In 'transitional' transitive and ditransitive verbs, a ì- prefix (represented
! here by ^L) appears after any preceding prefixes and before the TAMA chunks
! iff a direct object is morphologically marked on the verb.  If a direct
! object is understood, but isn't morphologically marked, then the ì- doesn't
! appear, e.g.,
!
!   nàgimìnistàhí át'a "I will put them down (non-plural animate objects)"
!                       (nà= gimi_ ^L . nis tàhí ...)
!   tłích'áká nànistàhí át'a "I will put down, set down the (two) dogs"
!                       (nà= . nis tàhí ...)
!
! We rely on the flag diacritic DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT to know when a direct 
! object marker is present on the verb.

@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@P.LOWTONE.ON@^L                          TAMA;
@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@                                             TAMA;


LEXICON TAMA

   0-IPFV       ;
   0-IPFV-STAT  ;
  ni-IPFV       ;
  si-IPFV       ;
   i-IPFV       ;
 isi-IPFV       ;

    0-PFV-STAT  ;
   ni-PFV       ;
   si-PFV       ;
 yi-y-PFV       ;
 yi-a-PFV       ;
  isi-PFV       ;

   yi-PROG      ;
    0-PROG      ;

   yi-POT       ;


!
! 0-IPFV
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@                   0-IPFV-AFF ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    0s-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    0i-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@iì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@iì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
! 0-IPFV middle prefixes share almost the same TAMA forms as inner prefixes in
! all but two cases:
!
!   1. The indefinite direct object i- "something" is accompanied by inner-
!      affix-like TAMA forms in 2SG (e.g., ít'ùd "you (sg.) are smoking
!      (something)", rather than *init'ùd), but outer-affix-like forms
!      for 1PL (e.g., isaàt'ùd "we are smoking (something)", rather than
!      *aàt'ùd). 
!
!   2. The transitional/semelfactive/inchoative prefix ì- (represented in this
!      model as "^L"), when not preceded by an(other) inner affix, also appears
!      with inner-affix-like TAMA forms in 2SG (e.g., xáaʔò "you (sg.) will
!      carry it (solid object) past", rather than *xaniʔò), but outer-affix-
!      like forms for 1PL (e.g., xáasaàʔò "we will carry it (solid object)
!      past", rather than *xaàʔò).
!
! We use the OBJECTPERSON.INDEF and LOWTONE.ON flag diacritics to catch both
! of these exceptions.  The remaining forms that have a middle prefix are
! identical to forms with inner prefixes *except* in 0-IPFV-STAT and 0-PFV-
! STAT, where 3PL and 4SG TAMA chunks have high tone not found on inner
! prefixes (e.g., ágíjàg "they became", not *ágijàg), requiring us to model
! middle prefixes separately here.
@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@                       0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@R.LOWTONE.ON@         0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@D.LOWTONE@            0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Regular;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Regular
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is                           #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í                            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i                            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@aà       #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@iì        #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@iì      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2                          #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.TAMA.%0@i                 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@
    0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.TAMA.%0@i                 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@
    0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-DOIndef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is                           #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í                            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i                            #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2                          #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.TAMA.%0@i                 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@
    0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.TAMA.%0@i                 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@
    0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@í                                           #;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@í                                          #;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@í                                         #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@               0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL-DObj;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@             0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL-DObj;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@           0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL-DObj;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-3PL-DObj
! O ágílàg "they made O; they did (it to) O" (= cases where there is no
! object prefix on the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@í                                             #;

! ágiyìlàg "they made it; they did (it to) it" (emphatic or non-emphatic);
! ásigìlàg "they made me; they did (it to) me"; áagìlàg "they mdae something;
! they did (it to) something" (= all cases where there is an object prefix on
! the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@i                                          #;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@i                                              #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@í                                           #;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@í                                          #;
@U.VALENCE.OO-EXPERIENCER@í                                         #;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@               0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG-DObj;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@             0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG-DObj;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@           0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG-DObj;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-4SG-DObj
! O áts'ílá "someone will make O; someone will do (it to) O" (= no object
! prefix on the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@í                                             #;

! áts'ílá "someone will make it; someone will do (it to) it" (= no object
! prefix on the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@í         #;

! ásits'ìlá "someone will make me; someone will do (it to) me"; áats'ìlá
! "someone will make something; someone will do (it to) something" (= an
! object prefix appears on the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@D.OBJECTPERSON.3@i                            #;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@D.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@i                           #;

! ámits'ìlá "someone will make *it*; someone will do (it to) *it*" (= an
! object prefix appears on the verb)
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.EMPHATIC@i                                          #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@i2saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@i2siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@i2siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as2   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
